Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2647.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 7 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 71STABLECOIN LICENSINGSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. ProceduresC. Miscellaneous ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.7101. Scope of chapter.7102. Purpose.1234567891011121314151617181920 7103. Definitions.§ 7101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to stablecoin licensing.§ 7102. Purpose.The purpose of this chapter is to implement the GENIUS Act and to:(1) Enable financial service providers of this Commonwealth to have the opportunity to issue stablecoins.(2) Provide for the regulation of payment stablecoins issued by licensees under this chapter.(3) Empower the department to issue regulations substantially similar to Federal regulations promulgated to implement the GENIUS Act.§ 7103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A domestic entity that applies for a license under this chapter."Appropriate Federal banking agency." As defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(q) (relating to definitions)."Bank Secrecy Act." All of the following:(1) 12 U.S.C. § 1829b (relating to retention of records by insured depository institutions).(2) Chapter 2 of the Bank Secrecy Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-508, 12 U.S.C. § 1951 et seq.), as amended.(3) 31 U.S.C. Subt. IV Ch. 53 Subch. II (relating to records and reports on monetary instruments transactions)."Board." The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.20260HB2647PN3643 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Commission." The Banking and Securities Commission of the Commonwealth."Comptroller." The Office of the Comptroller of the Currency."Department." The Department of Banking and Securities of the Commonwealth."Deposit." As defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(l) (relating to definitions)."Digital asset." A digital representation of value that is recorded on a cryptographically secured distributed ledger."Digital asset service provider." As follows:(1) A person that, for compensation or profit, engages in the business in the United States, including on behalf of customers or users in the United States, of any of the following:(i) Exchanging digital assets for monetary value.(ii) Exchanging digital assets for other digital assets.(iii) Transferring digital assets to a third party.(iv) Acting as a digital asset custodian.(v) Participating in financial services relating to digital asset issuance.(2) The term does not include:(i) A distributed ledger protocol.(ii) A person that develops, operates or engages in the business of developing distributed ledger protocols or self-custodial software interfaces.(iii) An immutable and self-custodial software interface.(iv) A person that develops, operates or engages in 20260HB2647PN3643 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the business of validating transactions or operating a distributed ledger.(v) A person that participates in a liquidity pool or other similar mechanism for the provisioning of liquidity for peer-to-peer transactions."Distributed ledger." Technology in which:(1) data is shared across a network that creates a public digital ledger of verified transactions or information among network participants; and(2) cryptography is used to link the data to maintain the integrity of the public digital ledger and execute other functions."Distributed ledger protocol." Publicly available and accessible executable software deployed to a distributed ledger, including a smart contract or a network of smart contracts."Domestic entity." As defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Federal branch." As defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(s)(2)."Federal qualified payment stablecoin issuer." Any of the following:(1) A nonbank entity, other than a state qualified payment stablecoin issuer, approved by the comptroller to issue payment stablecoins.(2) An uninsured national bank that is:(i) chartered by the comptroller; and(ii) approved by the comptroller to issue payment stablecoins.(3) A Federal branch that is approved by the comptroller to issue payment stablecoins."Financial activity." Either of the following:20260HB2647PN3643 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An activity approved by the board under 12 U.S.C. § 1843(k) (relating to interests in nonbanking organizations).(2) An activity described under section 2(7)(A) or 4(a)(7)(A) of the GENIUS Act."GENIUS Act." The Guiding and Establishing National Innovation for U.S. Stablecoins Act (Public Law 119-27, 139 Stat. 419, 12 U.S.C. § 5901 et seq.)."Insured credit union." As defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1752(7) (relating to definitions)."Insured depository institution." As defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(c)(2). The term includes an insured credit union."Lawful order." A final and valid writ, process, order, rule, decree, command or other requirement issued or promulgated under Federal law by a court of competent jurisdiction or by an authorized Federal agency under its statutory authority that satisfies all of the following:(1) Requires a person to seize, freeze, burn or prevent the transfer of payment stablecoins issued by the person.(2) Specifies with reasonable particularity the payment stablecoins or accounts subject to blocking.(3) Is subject to judicial or administrative review or appeal as provided by Federal law."Licensee." A domestic entity licensed under this chapter."Monetary value." Either of the following:(1) A national currency.(2) A deposit denominated in a national currency."Money." A medium of exchange currently authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government, including a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two or more countries.20260HB2647PN3643 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "National currency." Any of the following:(1) A Federal Reserve note as described in 12 U.S.C. § 411 (relating to issuance to reserve banks; nature of obligation; redemption).(2) Money standing to the credit of an account with a Federal Reserve Bank.(3) Money issued by a foreign central bank.(4) Money issued by an intergovernmental organization pursuant to an agreement by two or more governments."Nonbank entity." A person that is not a depository institution or subsidiary of a depository institution."Offer." To make available for purchase, sale or exchange."Payment stablecoin." As follows:(1) A digital asset:(i) That is, or is designed to be, used as a means of payment or settlement.(ii) The issuer of which:(A) Is obligated to convert, redeem or repurchase for a fixed amount of monetary value, not including a digital asset denominated in a fixed amount of monetary value.(B) Represents that the issuer will maintain, or create the reasonable expectation that the issuer will maintain, a stable value relative to the value of a fixed amount of monetary value.(2) The term does not include a digital asset that is any of the following:(i) A national currency.(ii) A deposit, including a deposit recorded using distributed ledger technology.20260HB2647PN3643 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) (A) Subject to clause (B), a security, as defined in:(I) 15 U.S.C. § 77b(a)(1) (relating to definitions; promotion of efficiency, competition, and capital formation);(II) 15 U.S.C. § 78c(a)(10) (relating to definitions and application); or(III) 15 U.S.C. § 80a-2(a)(36) (relating to definitions; applicability; rulemaking considerations).(B) For the avoidance of doubt, a bond, note, evidence of indebtedness or investment contract that was issued by a permitted payment stablecoin issuer shall not qualify as a security solely by virtue of its satisfying the conditions described in the definitions enumerated under clause (A), consistent with this chapter."Pennsylvania qualified payment stablecoin issuer." A state qualified payment stablecoin issuer licensed under this chapter."Permitted payment stablecoin issuer." A person formed in the United States that is any of the following:(1) A subsidiary of an insured depository institution that has been approved to issue payment stablecoins.(2) A Federal qualified payment stablecoin issuer.(3) A state qualified payment stablecoin issuer, including a licensee."Person." An individual, partnership, company, corporation, association, trust, estate, cooperative organization or other business entity, incorporated or unincorporated."Primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator." Any of the 20260HB2647PN3643 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following:(1) With respect to a subsidiary of an insured depository institution, other than an insured credit union, the appropriate Federal banking agency of the insured depository institution.(2) With respect to an insured credit union or a subsidiary of an insured credit union, the National Credit Union Administration.(3) With respect to a state chartered depository institution not specified under paragraph (1), the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the comptroller or the board.(4) With respect to a Federal qualified payment stablecoin issuer, the comptroller."Public company." An issuer required to file reports under 15 U.S.C. §§ 78m(a) (relating to periodical and other reports) and 78o(d) (relating to registration and regulation of brokers and dealers)."Registered public accounting firm." As defined in 15 U.S.C. § 7201(12) (relating to definitions)."Stablecoin certification review committee." As defined in section 2(27) of the GENIUS Act."State." Each of the several states of the United States, the District of Columbia and each territory of the United States."State chartered depository institution." A state depository institution as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(c)(5)."State payment stablecoin regulator." A state agency that has primary regulatory and supervisory authority in the state over entities that issue payment stablecoins."State qualified payment stablecoin issuer." An entity that:20260HB2647PN3643 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Is legally established under the laws of a state and approved to issue payment stablecoins by a state payment stablecoin regulator.(2) Is not an uninsured national bank chartered by the comptroller, a Federal branch, an insured depository institution or a subsidiary of the national bank, Federal branch or insured depository institution."Subsidiary." As defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(w)(4)."Subsidiary of an insured credit union." Any of the following:(1) An organization providing services to an insured credit union that are associated with the routine operations of credit unions, as described in 12 U.S.C. § 1757(7)(I) (relating to powers).(2) A credit union service organization, as the term is used under 12 CFR Pt. 712 (relating to credit union service organizations (CUSOs)), with respect to which the insured credit union has an ownership interest or to which the insured credit union has extended a loan.(3) A subsidiary of a state chartered insured credit union authorized under state law."Trust company." An entity that exists under the laws of this Commonwealth or another state authorized to act as a fiduciary, but which is not authorized to engage in the business of receiving deposits.SUBCHAPTER BPROCEDURESSec.7111. Issuance and treatment of payment stablecoins.7112. License required.20260HB2647PN3643 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7113. Certification required.7114. Requirements for issuing payment stablecoins.7115. Compliance with lawful orders.7116 . Limitation on payment stablecoin activities. 7117 . Audits and reports. § 7111. Issuance and treatment of payment stablecoins.(a) Limitation on issuers.--A person that is not a permitted payment stablecoin issuer may not issue a payment stablecoin in this Commonwealth.(b) Public companies.--A public company that is not predominantly engaged in one or more financial activities, or a wholly owned subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary or affiliate of the public company, may not issue a payment stablecoin in this Commonwealth unless the public company obtains the vote of the stablecoin certification review committee under section 4(a)(12)(B) of the GENIUS Act.(c) Foreign companies.--A company that is not domiciled in the United States or a territory of the United States and is not predominantly engaged in one or more financial activities may not issue a payment stablecoin in this Commonwealth unless the company obtains the vote of the stablecoin certification review committee under section 4(a)(12)(C) of the GENIUS Act.(d) Prohibition on offers or sales.--Except as provided in subsection (e) , beginning on the date that is three years after the date of enactment of the GENIUS Act, a digital asset service provider may not offer or sell a payment stablecoin to a person in this Commonwealth, unless the payment stablecoin is issued by a permitted payment stablecoin issuer.(e) Exempt transactions.--This section shall not apply to the following:20260HB2647PN3643 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The direct transfer of digital assets between two individuals acting on their own behalf and for their own lawful purposes, without the involvement of an intermediary.(2) A transaction involving the receipt of digital assets by an individual between an account owned by the individual in the United States and an account owned by the individual abroad that are offered by the same parent company.(3) A transaction by means of a software or hardware wallet that facilitates an individual's own custody of digital assets.(f) Exempt entities.--This chapter does not apply to insured depository institutions, Federal qualified payment stablecoin issuers or state qualified payment stablecoin issuers.(g) Relation to other licensing requirements.--A licensee or exempt entity is not required to obtain any other license or charter to perform the activities permitted in this chapter.§ 7112. License required.(a) Application generally.--To become a Pennsylvania qualified payment stablecoin issuer, a domestic entity shall apply to the department for a license under this chapter on a form and in a manner as prescribed by the department.(b) Officers or directors convicted of certain felonies.--(1) An individual who has been convicted of a felony offense involving insider trading, embezzlement, cybercrime, money laundering, financing of terrorism or financial fraud , or who would otherwise be prohibited from serving as an officer or director under 12 U.S.C. § 1829 (relating to penalty for unauthorized participation by convicted individual), may not serve as: 20260HB2647PN3643 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) an officer of a payment stablecoin issuer; or(ii) a director of a payment stablecoin issuer.(2) If a person knowingly participates in a violation of paragraph (1), the person shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $1,000,000 for each violation or to imprisonment not exceeding five years, or both.(3) If a licensee has reason to believe that a person knowingly violated paragraph (1), the licensee shall refer the matter to the Attorney General.(c) Evaluation of application.--Upon receipt of a substantially complete application under this section, the department shall evaluate the application using the following factors:(1) The ability of the applicant, based on financial condition and resources, to meet the requirements specified under sections 7114 (relating to requirements for issuing payment stablecoins), 7116 (relating to limitation on payment stablecoin activities) and 7117 (relating to audits and reports).(2) Whether an individual who has been convicted of a felony offense enumerated under subsection (b)(1) is serving as an officer or director of the applicant.(3) The competence, experience and integrity of the officers, directors and principal shareholders of the applicant and its subsidiaries and parent company, including: (i) The record of the officers, directors and principal shareholders of compliance with laws and regulations.(ii) The ability of the officers, directors and 20260HB2647PN3643 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 principal shareholders to fulfill commitments to, and conditions imposed by, the department in connection with the application at issue and any prior application.(4) Whether the redemption policy of the applicant meets the requirements under section 7114.(5) Any other factors established under Federal regulations or by the department that are necessary to ensure the safety and soundness of the licensee.(d) Notification.--Not later than 30 days after receiving an application under this section, the department shall notify the applicant as to whether the department considers the application to be substantially complete and, if the application is not substantially complete, the additional information the applicant must provide for the application to be considered substantially complete.(e) Substantially complete.--(1) For purposes of this section, an application shall be considered substantially complete if the application contains sufficient information for the department to render a decision on whether the applicant satisfies the factors described in subsection (c).(2) An application considered substantially complete under this subsection remains substantially complete unless there is a material change in circumstances that requires the department to treat the application as a new application.(f) Timing for decision.--Not later than 120 days after receiving a substantially complete application under this section, the department shall render a decision on the application.(g) Failure to render decision.--If the department fails to 20260HB2647PN3643 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 render a decision on a complete application under this section within the time period specified in subsection (f), the application shall be deemed approved.(h) Denial of application.--The department shall only deny a substantially complete application received under this section if the department determines that the activities of the applicant would be unsafe or unsound based on the factors described in subsection (c). The issuance of a payment stablecoin on an open, public or decentralized network shall not be a valid ground for denial of an application received under subsection (a).(i) Explanation required.--If the department denies an application received under this section, not later than 30 days after the date of the denial, the department shall provide the applicant with written notice explaining the denial with specificity, including all findings made by the department with respect to all identified material shortcomings in the application, including actionable recommendations on how the applicant could address the identified material shortcomings.(j) Opportunity for hearing and final determination.--(1) Not later than 30 days after the date of receipt of any notice of the denial of an application under this section, the applicant may file a written appeal with the commission.(2) Upon receipt of a timely request under paragraph (1), the commission shall schedule a time and place for a hearing at which the applicant's appeal of the license denial may be heard. The following apply:(i) The hearing shall not be later than 30 days after the date of receipt of the request.20260HB2647PN3643 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The commission shall provide notice to the applicant of the time and place for the hearing.(3) Not later than 60 days after the date of the hearing under paragraph (2), the commission shall notify the applicant of a final determination, which shall contain a statement of the basis for the determination, with specific findings.(4) If an applicant does not make a timely request for a hearing under paragraph (2), the department shall notify the applicant, not later than 10 days after the date by which the applicant may request a hearing under paragraph (2), in writing, that the denial of the application is a final determination of the department.(5) The denial of an application under this section shall not prohibit the applicant from filing a subsequent application.§ 7113. Certification required.(a) Certification of program implementation.--Not later than 180 days after the approval of an application, and on an annual basis thereafter, each licensee shall submit to the department a certification that the licensee has implemented anti-money laundering and economic sanctions compliance programs that are reasonably designed to prevent the licensee from facilitating money laundering, including money laundering for cartels and organizations designated as foreign terrorist organizations under 8 U.S.C. § 1189 (relating to designation of foreign terrorist organizations) and the financing of terrorist activities, consistent with the requirements of the GENIUS Act.(b) Availability of certifications.--The department shall make certifications described in subsection (a) available to the 20260HB2647PN3643 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 United States Secretary of the Treasury upon request.(c) Penalties.--(1) The department may revoke the license of a licensee that does not submit a certification in accordance with subsection (a).(2) A person that knowingly submits a certification in accordance with subsection (a) that is false shall be subject to the criminal penalties specified under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4903 (relating to false swearing).(3) If the department has reason to believe that a person has knowingly violated subsection (a), the department may refer the matter to the Attorney General or Attorney General of the United States.§ 7114. Requirements for issuing payment stablecoins.(a) Duties of licensee.--A licensee shall:(1) Maintain identifiable reserves backing the outstanding payment stablecoins of the licensee on at least a one-to-one basis, with reserves comprising any of the following:(i) United States coins and currency, including Federal Reserve notes, or money standing to the credit of an account with a Federal Reserve Bank.(ii) Money held as demand deposits, or other deposits that may be withdrawn upon request at any time, or insured shares at an insured depository institution, including a foreign branch or agent or correspondent bank of an insured depository institution, subject to limitations established by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and the National Credit Union Administration, as applicable, to address safety and soundness risks of 20260HB2647PN3643 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the insured depository institution.(iii) Treasury bills, notes or bonds:(A) with a remaining maturity of 93 days or less; or(B) issued with a maturity of 93 days or less.(iv) Money received under a repurchase agreement, with the licensee acting as a seller of securities and with an overnight maturity, that is backed by Treasury bills with a maturity of 93 days or less.(v) A reverse repurchase agreement, with the licensee acting as a purchaser of securities and with an overnight maturity, that is collateralized by Treasury notes, bills or bonds on an overnight basis, subject to overcollateralization in line with standard market terms, that are:(A) tri-party;(B) centrally cleared through a clearing agency registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission; or(C) bilateral with a counterparty that the issuer has determined to be adequately creditworthy even in the event of severe market stress.(vi) A security issued by an investment company registered under 15 U.S.C. § 80a-8(a) (relating to registration of investment companies) or other registered government money market fund and invested solely in an underlying asset described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii), (iv) or (v).(vii) Any other similarly liquid Federal Government-issued asset approved by the primary Federal payment 20260HB2647PN3643 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stablecoin regulator, in consultation with the department, if applicable, of the licensee.(viii) Any reserve described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii), (vi) or (vii) in tokenized form, if the reserve complies with all applicable laws and regulations.(2) Publicly disclose the licensee's redemption policy, which must:(i) Establish clear and conspicuous procedures for timely redemption of outstanding payment stablecoins, but only the department may impose discretionary limitations on timely redemptions.(ii) Publicly, clearly and conspicuously disclose in plain language all fees associated with purchasing or redeeming the payment stablecoins, but the fees may only be changed upon not less than seven days' prior notice to consumers.(3) Publish the monthly composition of the issuer's reserves on the website of the issuer, containing:(i) The total number of outstanding payment stablecoins issued by the licensee.(ii) The amount and composition of the reserves described in paragraph (1), including the average tenor and geographic location of custody of each category of reserve instruments.(b) Prohibition on rehypothecation.--Reserves required under subsection (a)(1) may not be pledged, rehypothecated or reused by the licensee, either directly or indirectly, except for the purpose of:(1) satisfying margin obligations in connection with 20260HB2647PN3643 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investments in permitted reserves under subsection (a)(1)(iv) and (v);(2) satisfying obligations associated with the use, receipt or provision of standard custodial services; or(3) creating liquidity to meet reasonable expectations of requests to redeem payment stablecoins, such that reserves in the form of Treasury bills may be sold as purchased securities for repurchase agreements with a maturity of 93 days or less, provided that:(i) the repurchase agreements are cleared by a clearing agency registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission; or(ii) the licensee receives the prior approval of the department or its primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator, as applicable.(c) Monthly certification and examination of reports by registered public accounting firm.--(1) Each month, a licensee shall have the information disclosed in the previous month-end report required under subsection (a)(3) examined by a registered public accounting firm.(2) Each month, the chief executive officer and chief financial officer of a licensee shall submit a certification as to the accuracy of the monthly report to the department.(3) A person who submits a certification required under paragraph (2) knowing that the certification is false shall be subject to the same criminal penalties as those specified under 18 U.S.C. § 1350(c) (relating to failure of corporate officers to certify financial reports).(d) Capital, liquidity and risk management requirements.--20260HB2647PN3643 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall, consistent with section 7121(f) (relating to authority of department), issue regulations implementing:(1) Capital requirements applicable to licensees that:(i) Are tailored to the business model and risk profile of licensees.(ii) Do not exceed requirements that are sufficient to ensure the ongoing operations of licensees.(2) The liquidity standard under subsection (a)(1).(3) Reserve asset diversification, including deposit concentration at banking institutions, and interest rate risk management standards applicable to licensees that:(i) Are tailored to the business model and risk profile of licensees.(ii) Do not exceed standards that are sufficient to ensure the ongoing operations of licensees.(4) Appropriate operational, compliance and information technology risk management principles-based requirements and standards, including standards under the Bank Secrecy Act and sanctions compliance standards that:(i) Are tailored to the business model and risk profile of licensees.(ii) Are consistent with applicable law.(e) Treatment under Bank Secrecy Act and sanctions laws.--A licensee shall be treated as a financial institution for purposes of the Bank Secrecy Act and, as such, shall be subject to all Federal laws applicable to a financial institution located in the United States relating to economic sanctions, prevention of money laundering, customer identification and due diligence, including:(1) The maintenance of an effective anti-money 20260HB2647PN3643 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 laundering program, which shall include appropriate risk assessments and designation of an officer to supervise the program.(2) The retention of appropriate records.(3) Monitoring and reporting of any suspicious transaction relevant to a possible violation of law or regulation.(4) Technical capabilities, policies and procedures to block, freeze and reject specific or impermissible transactions that violate Federal or State laws, rules or regulations.(5) The maintenance of an effective customer identification program, including identification and verification of account holders with the licensee, high-value transactions and appropriate enhanced due diligence.(6) The maintenance of an effective economic sanctions compliance program, including verification of sanctions lists, consistent with Federal law.§ 7115. Compliance with lawful orders.A licensee shall possess the technological capability to comply with a lawful order and shall comply with the lawful order.§ 7116 . Limitation on payment stablecoin activities. (a) Licensee limitations.--A licensee may only:(1) Issue payment stablecoins.(2) Redeem payment stablecoins.(3) Manage related reserves, including purchasing, selling and holding reserve assets or providing custodial services for reserve assets, consistent with Federal and State law.20260HB2647PN3643 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Provide custodial or safekeeping services for payment stablecoins, required reserves or private keys of payment stablecoins, as otherwise permitted by Federal and State law.(5) Undertake other activities that directly support any of the activities described in this subsection.(b) Additional limitations.--A licensee may not engage in transactions with affiliates at less than arms-length or breach quantitative or qualitative limits and other prudential requirements for transactions between the licensee and its affiliates as may be promulgated by the commission.(c) Construction.--Nothing in subsection (a) shall limit a licensee from engaging in payment stablecoin activities or digital asset service provider activities specified by this chapter, and activities incidental thereto, that are authorized by the department or the primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator, as applicable, consistent with all other Federal and State laws, provided that the claims of payment stablecoin holders rank senior to any potential claims of nonstablecoin creditors with respect to the reserve assets, consistent with section 7124 (relating to treatment of licensees in insolvency proceedings).(d) Prohibition on tying.--A licensee may not provide services to a customer on the condition that the customer obtain an additional paid product or service from the licensee, or any of its subsidiaries, or agree to not obtain an additional product or service from a competitor.(e) Prohibition on interest.--A licensee may not pay the holder of any payment stablecoin any form of interest or yield, whether in cash, tokens or other consideration, solely in 20260HB2647PN3643 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 connection with the holding, use or retention of the payment stablecoin.(f) Prohibition on use of deceptive names.--(1) A licensee may not:(i) Use any combination of terms relating to the United States Government, including "United States," "United States Government" and "U.S.G." in the name of a payment stablecoin.(ii) Use any combination of terms relating to the Commonwealth or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth in the name of a payment stablecoin unless authorized by an act of the General Assembly. The department shall issue and update guidance under section 7121 (relating to authority of department) identifying prohibited terms under this subparagraph.(iii) Market a payment stablecoin in such a way that a reasonable person would perceive the payment stablecoin to be:(A) legal tender, as described in 31 U.S.C. § 5103 (relating to legal tender);(B) issued by the United States;(C) guaranteed or approved by the Federal Government ; or (D) issued or approved by the Commonwealth or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth.(2) Abbreviations directly relating to the currency to which a payment stablecoin is pegged, including "U.S.D.," are not subject to the prohibitions under paragraph (1).(g) Uninsured status of payment stablecoins.--(1) Payment stablecoins shall not be:20260HB2647PN3643 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) backed by the full faith and credit of the United States;(ii) guaranteed by the Federal Government;(iii) subject to deposit insurance by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; or(iv) subject to share insurance by the National Credit Union Administration.(2) With respect to misrepresentation of insured status:(i) It shall be unlawful to represent that payment stablecoins are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States, guaranteed by the Federal Government or subject to Federal deposit insurance or Federal share insurance.(ii) A violation of subparagraph (i) shall be considered a violation of 12 U.S.C. § 1828(a)(4) (relating to regulations governing insured depository institutions) or 18 U.S.C. § 709 (relating to false advertising or misuse of names to indicate Federal agency), as applicable.§ 7117 . Audits and reports. (a) Annual financial statement.--(1) A licensee with more than $50,000,000,000 in consolidated total outstanding issuance, that is not subject to the reporting requirements under 15 U.S.C. §§ 78m (relating to periodical and other reports) and 78o(d) (relating to registration and regulation of brokers and dealers), shall prepare, in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, an annual financial statement, which must include the disclosure of any related party transactions, as defined by the generally accepted 20260HB2647PN3643 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accounting principles.(2) A registered public accounting firm shall perform an audit of the annual financial statements described in paragraph (1).(3) An audit described in paragraph (1) shall be conducted in accordance with all applicable auditing standards established by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board, including those relating to auditor independence, internal controls and related party transactions.(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit, alter or expand the jurisdiction of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board over permitted payment stablecoin issuers or registered public accounting firms.(b) Public disclosure and submission to Federal regulators.--Each licensee required to prepare an audited annual financial statement under subsection (a) shall:(1) Post the audited financial statements on the publicly accessible Internet website of the licensee.(2) Submit the audited financial statements annually to the licensee's primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator.SUBCHAPTER CMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.7121. Authority of department.7122. Enforcement.7123. Authority of insured depository institutions.7124. Treatment of licensees in insolvency proceedings.7125. Transition to Federal oversight.7126. Custody of payment stablecoin reserve and collateral.20260HB2647PN3643 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 7121. Authority of department.(a) Implementation.--To carry out the purposes of this chapter, the department may:(1) Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials, Federal or state regulatory agencies or regulatory associations to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by standardizing methods or procedures and sharing resources, records or related information obtained under this chapter.(2) Use, hire, contract or employ analytical systems, methods or software to examine or investigate a person subject to this chapter.(3) Accept from other Federal or state government agencies or officials licensing, examination or investigation reports made by the Federal or state government agencies or officials.(4) Accept an audit report made by an independent certified public accountant or other qualified third-party auditor for an applicant or licensee and incorporate the audit report in a report of examination or investigation.(b) Administrative authority.--The department shall have the broad authority to administer, interpret and enforce this chapter and recover the cost of administering and enforcing this chapter by imposing and collecting proportionate and equitable fees and costs associated with applications, examinations, investigations and other actions required to achieve the purpose of this chapter.(c) Supervision.--(1) The department may conduct an examination or investigation of a licensee or otherwise take independent 20260HB2647PN3643 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 action authorized by this chapter or issue any regulation or order under this chapter as reasonably necessary or appropriate to administer and enforce this chapter, regulations implementing this chapter and other applicable Federal or State law.(2) A licensee shall provide, and the department shall have full and complete access to, all records that the department may reasonably require to conduct a complete examination. The following apply:(i) The records must be provided at the location and in the format specified by the department.(ii) The department may utilize multistate record production standards and examination procedures when the standards will reasonably achieve the requirements of this chapter.(iii) In connection with an examination, the department may:(A) Conduct an examination either on-site or off-site as the department may reasonably require, the reasonable costs of which shall be paid by the licensee.(B) Conduct an examination in conjunction with an examination conducted by representatives of other State agencies or agencies of another state or of the Federal Government.(C) Accept the examination report of another State agency or an agency of another state or of the Federal Government, or a report prepared by an independent accounting firm, which on being accepted shall be considered for all purposes as an official 20260HB2647PN3643 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 report of the department.(D) Summon and examine under oath a key individual or employee of a licensee and require the person to produce records regarding any matter related to the condition and business of the licensee or authorized delegate.(d) Exclusion.--This chapter shall not apply to a permitted payment stablecoin issuer to the extent that Federal law precludes or preempts, or has been determined to preclude or preempt, the application of the provisions of this chapter to any permitted payment stablecoin issuer.(e) Federal requirements.--The department shall, through regulation or other means of notice, identify the Federal laws and regulations applicable to licensees under this chapter. The department shall ensure that the minimum Federal requirements apply to all licensees approved by the department by examination or other means.(f) Regulations.--The department may issue regulations, statements of policy , orders or guidance as may be necessary for the proper conduct, including safety and soundness, of the stablecoin business by licensees, the issuance and renewal of licenses and the enforcement of this chapter. A statement of policy, order or guidance issued under this subsection may not be used as a substitute for or alternative to promulgating a regulation required under the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act . (g) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this chapter, the department may promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than three years 20260HB2647PN3643 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following the publication of the temporary regulations. The department may promulgate temporary regulations under this subsection that are not subject to:(i) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(ii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iii) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act . (2) The department's authority to adopt temporary regulations under paragraph (1) shall expire three years after the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.§ 7122. Enforcement.(a) Suspension and revocation.--The department may suspend or revoke a license if any of the following applies:(1) The licensee violates this chapter or a regulation or order issued under this chapter.(2) The licensee does not cooperate with an examination or investigation by the department.(3) The licensee engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation or gross negligence.(4) The competence, experience, character or general fitness of the licensee, person in control of a licensee, key individual or responsible person of the authorized delegate indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the person to issue payment stablecoins.20260HB2647PN3643 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice.(6) The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of its obligations or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors.(b) Unsafe or unsound practice.--In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, the department may consider:(1) The size and condition of the licensee's payment stablecoin issuance.(2) The magnitude of the loss.(3) The gravity of the violation of this chapter.(4) The previous conduct of the person involved.(c) Orders to cease and desist.--(1) If a person is engaged in unlicensed activity or, in the case of a licensee, the department determines that a violation of this chapter or of a regulation or order issued under this chapter by a licensee is likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm to the licensee, its customers or the public as a result of the violation, or cause insolvency or significant dissipation of assets of the licensee, the department may issue an order requiring the person or licensee to cease and desist from the violation. The order shall become effective upon service of the order upon the person or licensee.(2) An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending the completion of an administrative proceeding consistent with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies).(3) A person or licensee that is served with an order to 20260HB2647PN3643 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cease and desist may petition Commonwealth Court for a judicial order setting aside, limiting or suspending the enforcement, operation or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an administrative proceeding under 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A.(4) An order to cease and desist expires unless the department commences an administrative proceeding under 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A within 30 days after the order is issued.(d) Consent orders.--The department may enter into a consent order at any time with a person to resolve a matter arising under this chapter or a regulation or order issued under this chapter. A consent order:(1) Must be signed by the person to whom the consent order is issued or by the person's authorized representative.(2) Must indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order.(3) May provide that the consent order does not constitute an admission by a person that this chapter or a regulation or order issued under this chapter has been violated.(e) Criminal penalties.--A person that directly or through another person violates or attempts to violate a provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not less than $5,000 nor more than $50,000 or imprisonment not exceeding seven years, or both, in the discretion of the court.(f) Civil penalties.--The department may assess a civil penalty against a person that violates this chapter or a regulation or order issued under this chapter in an amount not 20260HB2647PN3643 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to exceed $10,000 per violation for each day the violation is outstanding.(g) Injunctions.--The department may maintain an action for an injunction or other process against a person to restrain and prevent the person from engaging in an activity violating this chapter.(h) Final orders.--(1) A decision of the commission and an unappealed order of the department shall be a final order of the department and shall be enforceable in a court of competent jurisdiction.(2) The department may publish final adjudications issued under this section, subject to redaction or modification to preserve confidentiality.(i) Appeals.--A person aggrieved by a decision of the commission may appeal the decision under 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).§ 7123. Authority of insured depository institutions.(a) Construction.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the authority of an insured depository institution or trust company to engage in activities permissible for the entity in accordance with applicable Federal and State law, including:(1) Accepting or receiving deposits or, in the case of a credit union, shares and issuing digital assets that represent the deposits or shares.(2) Utilizing a distributed ledger for the books and records of the entity and to effect intrabank transfers.(3) Providing custodial services for payment stablecoins, private keys of payment stablecoins or reserves 20260HB2647PN3643 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 backing payment stablecoins.(b) Insured depository institutions chartered by Commonwealth.--An insured depository institution chartered under the laws of this Commonwealth that has a subsidiary that is a permitted payment stablecoin issuer may engage in the business of money transmission or provide custodial services through the permitted payment stablecoin issuer in this Commonwealth or in any other state.§ 7124. Treatment of licensees in insolvency proceedings.In an insolvency proceeding of a licensee approved by the department, including an insolvency proceeding administered by the department:(1) The claim of a person holding payment stablecoins issued by the licensee shall have priority, on a ratable basis with the claims of other persons holding the payment stablecoins, over the claims of the licensee and any other holder of claims against the licensee with respect to required payment stablecoin reserves.(2) A person holding a payment stablecoin issued by the licensee shall be deemed to hold a claim.(3) The priority under paragraph (1) shall not apply to claims other than those arising directly from the holding of payment stablecoins.§ 7125. Transition to Federal oversight.A licensee whose payment stablecoin has a consolidated total outstanding issuance of more than $10,000,000,000 shall engage in one of the following:(1) No later than 360 days after the payment stablecoin reaches that threshold, transition to the Federal regulatory framework under section 4(a) of the GENIUS Act administered 20260HB2647PN3643 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the department and the comptroller, acting in coordination.(2) Beginning on the date the payment stablecoin reaches that threshold, cease issuing new payment stablecoins until the payment stablecoin is below the $10,000,000,000 consolidated total outstanding issuance threshold.§ 7126. Custody of payment stablecoin reserve and collateral.(a) Requirements.--A person may engage in the business of providing custodial or safekeeping services for payment stablecoin reserve, payment stablecoins used as collateral or private keys used to issue permitted payment stablecoins only if all of the following apply:(1) The person is subject to any of the following:(i) Supervision or regulation by a primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator or a primary financial regulatory agency described in 12 U.S.C. § 5301(12)(B) or (C) (relating to definitions).(ii) Supervision by a State bank supervisor as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(r) (relating to definitions), or a State credit union supervisor as defined in section 6003(9) of the Anti-Money Laundering Act of 2020 (Division F of Public Law 116-283, 134 Stat. 3388), if the State bank supervisor or State credit union supervisor makes available to the board the information that the board determines is necessary and relevant to the categories of information under subsection (d).(2) The person complies with subsection (b), unless the person holds the property in accordance with similar requirements imposed by a primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator, the Securities and Exchange Commission or the 20260HB2647PN3643 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commodity Futures Trading Commission.(b) Customer property.--A person specified under subsection (a), with respect to property described under subsection (a), shall have the following duties:(1) Treat and deal with payment stablecoins, private keys, cash and other property of a customer as belonging to the customer and not as property of the person.(2) Take steps appropriate to protect payment stablecoins, private keys, cash and other property of the customer from claims of creditors of the person.(c) Commingling.--(1) Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, payment stablecoin reserve, payment stablecoins, cash and other property of a permitted payment stablecoin issuer or customer shall be separately accounted for by a person specified under subsection (a) and shall be segregated from and not commingled with assets of the person.(2) Payment stablecoin reserve, payment stablecoins, cash and other property of a permitted payment stablecoin issuer or customer may be commingled and deposited in an omnibus account holding payment stablecoin reserve, payment stablecoins, cash and other property of more than one permitted payment stablecoin issuer or customer at a State-chartered depository institution, insured depository institution, national bank or trust company. Payment stablecoin reserve in the form of cash held as a deposit liability at a depository institution shall not be subject to a requirement relating to the separation of the cash from property of the applicable depository institution.(3) The share of payment stablecoin reserve, payment 20260HB2647PN3643 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stablecoins, cash and other property of the permitted payment stablecoin issuer or customer necessary to transfer, adjust or settle a transaction or transfer of assets may be withdrawn and applied to that purpose, including the payment of commissions, taxes, storage and other charges lawfully accruing in connection with the provision of services by a person specified under subsection (a).(4) In accordance with terms and conditions imposed by a primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator by rule, regulation or order, payment stablecoin reserve, payment stablecoins, cash and other property described in this subsection may be commingled and deposited in permitted payment stablecoin issuer or customer accounts with payment stablecoin reserve, payment stablecoins, cash and other property received by the person and required by the primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator to be separately accounted for, treated as and dealt with as belonging to the permitted payment stablecoin issuer or customer.(5) An insured depository institution that provides custodial or safekeeping services for payment stablecoin reserve may hold payment stablecoin reserve in the form of cash on deposit if that treatment is consistent with Federal law.(6) With respect to payment stablecoins held by a person specified under subsection (a) for a customer, the claims of the customer against the person with respect to the payment stablecoins shall have priority over claims of another person, other than claims of another customer with respect to payment stablecoins held by the person, regardless of whether the payment stablecoins are segregated under paragraph (1), 20260HB2647PN3643 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unless the customer expressly consents to the priority of the other claim.(d) Regulatory information.--A person specified under subsection (a) shall submit to the applicable primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator information concerning the person's business operations and processes to protect customer assets, in the form and manner determined by the primary Federal payment stablecoin regulator.(e) Exclusion.--This section shall not apply to a person solely because the person engages in the business of providing hardware or software to facilitate a customer's own custody or safekeeping of the customer's payment stablecoins or private keys.(f) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "customer" means a person for whom or on whose behalf a person specified under subsection (a) receives, acquires or holds payment stablecoins, private keys, cash or other property.Section 2. The Department of Banking and Securities shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin that all of the required implementing regulations for 7 Pa.C.S. Ch. 71 have been promulgated and that the Department of Banking and Securities is ready to begin accepting applications for licensure under 7 Pa.C.S. Ch. 71.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 7 Pa.C.S. § 7112 shall take effect upon the publication of the notice under section 2 of this act.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2647PN3643 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930